Utah statutes.
76-6-409.10.   Payment of restitution -- Civil action -- Other remedies retained.

(1)  A person who violates Sections 76-6-409.5 through 76-6-409.9 shall make restitution to the telecommunication service provider for the value of the telecommunication service consumed in violation of this section plus all reasonable expenses and costs incurred on account of the violation of this section.  Reasonable expenses and costs include expenses and costs for investigation, service calls, employee time, and equipment use.

(2)  Criminal prosecution under this section does not affect the right of a telecommunication service provider to bring a civil action for redress for damages suffered as a result of the commission of any of the acts prohibited by this section.

(3)  This section does not abridge or alter any other right, action, or remedy otherwise available to a telecommunication service provider.

